Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HNUB TSHIAB: HMONG WOMEN ACHIEVING TOGETHER.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Hnub Tshiab: Hmong Women Achieving Together, to acquire property for and to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip a community center in Ramsey County, for educational and leadership development programs to promote and strengthen cultural knowledge and identity, and social change to improve the lives of Hmong women and girls. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end